Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 3
Limitations on Debtors’ Liabilities

§ 28-45-301. Limitation on default charges.

Except for reasonable expenses incurred in realizing on a security interest, the agreement with respect to a regulated consumer credit transaction may not provide for any charges as a result of default by the debtor except those authorized by this act. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-301, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-302. Assignee subject to claims and defenses.

With respect to a regulated consumer credit sale, an assignee of the rights of the seller is subject to all claims and defenses of the debtor against the seller arising from the sale of property or services, notwithstanding that:

There is an agreement to the contrary; or

The assignee is a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument issued in violation of the provisions on prohibition of certain negotiable instruments, section 28-43-306, Idaho Code.

The assignee’s liability under subsection (1) of this section may not exceed the amount owing to the assignee with respect to the sale at the time the assignee has notice of a claim or defense of the buyer. If debts arising from two (2) or more regulated consumer credit sales, other than pursuant to an open-end credit account, are consolidated, payments received after the consolidation are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount owing the assignee with respect to a sale, to have been first applied to the payment of debts arising from the sales first made; if the debts consolidated arose from sales made on the same day, payments are deemed to have been first applied to the smallest debt. Payments received upon an open-end consumer credit account are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount owing the assignee with respect to a sale, to have been first applied to the payment of finance charges in the order of their entry to the account and then to the payment of debts in the order in which the entries to the account showing the debts were made.

An agreement may not provide for greater rights for an assignee than this section permits.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-302, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.